Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.522

Waiver of tuition and fees for long-term unemployed or underemployed persons—Community and technical colleges.

(1) The governing boards of the community and technical colleges may waive all or a portion of the tuition and services and activities fees for persons under subsection (2) of this section pursuant to the following conditions:

(a) Such persons shall register for and be enrolled in courses on a space available basis and new course sections shall not be created as a result of the registration;

(b) Enrollment information on persons registered pursuant to this section shall be maintained separately from other enrollment information and shall not be included in official enrollment reports, nor shall such persons be considered in any enrollment statistics which would affect budgetary determinations; and

(c) Persons who enroll under this section shall have the same access to support services as do all other students and shall be subject to all course prerequisite requirements.

(2) A person is eligible for the waiver under subsection (1) of this section if the person:

(a) Meets the requirements for a resident student under RCW 28B.15.011 through 28B.15.015;

(b) Is twenty-one years of age or older;

(c) At the time of initial enrollment under subsection (1) of this section, has not attended an institution of higher education for the previous six months;

(d) Is not receiving or is not entitled to receive unemployment compensation of any nature under Title 50 RCW; and

(e) Has an income at or below the need standard established under chapter 74.04 RCW by the department of social and health services.

(3) The state board for community and technical colleges shall adopt rules to carry out this section.

[ 2015 c 55 s 218; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 17; 1992 c 231 s 13; 1985 c 390 s 27; 1984 c 50 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Intent—1984 c 50: "The legislature finds that providing educational opportunities to the long-term unemployed and underemployed is a valuable incentive to these individuals to reestablish themselves as contributing members of society. To this end, the legislature finds that creating the opportunity for these people to attend the state's community colleges on a space available basis, without charge, will provide the impetus for self-improvement without drawing upon the limited resources of the state or its institutions." [ 1984 c 50 s 1.]

Severability—1984 c 50: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1984 c 50 s 4.]